Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 40
UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN COLORADO

Section

23-40-101. University established - role and mission.

There is hereby established a university at Greeley, to be known as the university of northern Colorado. The university shall be a comprehensive baccalaureate and specialized graduate research university with selective admission standards.

The university of northern Colorado shall be the primary institution for undergraduate and graduate degree programs for educational personnel preparation in the state of Colorado. The university shall offer master's and doctoral programs primarily in the field of education. The university has the responsibility to offer on a statewide basis, utilizing where possible and appropriate the faculty and facilities of other educational institutions, those graduate-level programs needed by professional educators and education administrators. The Colorado commission on higher education shall include in its funding recommendations an appropriate level of general fund support for those programs.

As part of its mission as a graduate research university specializing in programs for educational personnel, the university of northern Colorado shall include the education innovation institute created in section 23-40-106 for the purposes described in section 23-40-106 (2).

The university of northern Colorado may offer specialized degree programs in osteopathic medicine. The osteopathic medicine degree programs are not prohibited by the exclusive authority in medicine of the health sciences center campus of the university of Colorado described in section 23-20-101 (1)(d).

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 409, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6125.

C.L.

§ 8153.

CSA:

C. 155, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 124-6-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-6-1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 763, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2595, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-032), ch. 13, p. 80, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2022:

(4) added, (SB 22-056), ch. 27, p. 163, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 13, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

23-40-102. Name of institution changed.

The state school at Greeley, referred to under the name and title of the "Colorado state college of education at Greeley" by article 6 of chapter 124, CRS 53, and amendments thereto, and under the name and title of the "Colorado state college" by this article, after May 1, 1970, shall be designated under the name and title of the "university of northern Colorado"; but the legal effect of any statute designating such institution by any other name or property rights acquired and obligations incurred under any other name prior to May 1, 1970, shall not be impaired hereby.

The intent of the general assembly in making the name change provided for in subsection (1) of this section is to recognize and affirm the university status of what was formerly known as Colorado state college and to be known in the future as the university of northern Colorado without changing the present function of such institution as an institution of higher education primarily concerned with the preparation of teachers at all educational levels.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 713, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 124-6-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-6-8.

L. 70:

p. 350, § 1.

23-40-103. Funds for maintenance.

The funds and revenues for the establishment and maintenance of the university of northern Colorado, for the payment of its officers, teachers, and employees, and for all purposes incident thereto or necessary for the proper founding, continuance, and successful conduct thereof shall be appropriated and apportioned in such manner as the general assembly provides by law.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 413, § 15.

R.S. 08:

§ 6126.

C.L.

§ 8155.

CSA:

C. 155, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 124-6-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-6-2.

23-40-103.5. Board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado fund - creation - control - use.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado fund which shall be under the control of and administered by the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado in accordance with the provisions of this article. Except as otherwise allowed by section 24-36-103 (2), C.R.S., all moneys received or acquired by the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado or by the university of northern Colorado, whether by appropriation, grant, contract, or gift, by sale or lease of surplus real or personal property, or by any other means, whose disposition is not otherwise provided for by law, and all interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to said fund. The moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado and shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

The moneys in the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado fund shall be used by the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado for the payment of salaries and operating expenses of the board of trustees and of the university of northern Colorado and for the payment of any other expenses incurred by the board of trustees in carrying out its statutory powers and duties.

Moneys in the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado fund which are not needed for immediate use by the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado may be invested by the state treasurer in investments authorized by sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. The board shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund which may be invested and shall notify the state treasurer in writing of such amount.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 316, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 369, § 4, effective September 1.

23-40-104. Board of trustees.

There is hereby established the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado, which shall consist of nine members and shall be the governing authority for the university of northern Colorado. The board created by this subsection (1) shall be and is hereby declared to be a body corporate and, as such and by the names designated in this section, may hold property for the use of the university which it governs, be a party to all suits and contracts, and do all things lawfully appertaining to such university in like manner as municipal corporations of this state. The trustees of the board created by this section and their successors shall have perpetual succession, shall have a seal, may make bylaws and regulations for the well-ordering and government of the university within their jurisdiction, and may conduct the business of said university in a manner not repugnant to the constitution and laws of this state. Staff support for said board of trustees shall be provided by the staff of the university of northern Colorado.

The governor shall appoint, with the consent of the senate, seven members of the board of trustees created by this subsection (1).

Members appointed by the governor shall serve terms of up to four years, expiring on December 31 of the third calendar year following the calendar year in which the member is appointed; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than two members' terms expire in the same year.

and (IV) Repealed.

(V) Of the seven members appointed by the governor, no more than four members shall be from the same political party.

(VI) The eighth office shall be filled by an elected member of the student body who is a full-time junior or senior student at the university of northern Colorado. The term of said elected office shall be one year, beginning July 1. The elected student office shall be advisory, without the right to vote. The elected student member of the board shall have resided in the state of Colorado not less than three years prior to his or her election. For purposes of this paragraph (b), "full-time student" means the equivalent of the definition of "full-time equivalent student" used by the joint budget committee of the general assembly. The ninth office shall be filled by an elected member of the faculty at large elected by other members of the faculty at large for a term of one year, beginning July 1, and such office shall be advisory, without the right to vote.

(VII) All vacancies in the office of any member appointed by the governor shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term, and any vacancy in either of the elected offices on the board shall be filled by reelection for the unexpired term.

(VIII) Each trustee shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 211, § 32, effective July 16; entire section added, p. 738, § 3, effective January 1, 1976.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1121, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 83:

(1)(c) repealed, p. 807, § 1, effective March 22.

L. 87:

(1)(b) amended, p. 908, § 16, effective June 15.

L. 88:

(2) amended, p. 858, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) repealed, p. 793, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1230, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2011:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 11-1060), ch. 31, p. 87, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(1)(b)(VIII) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 694, § 11, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1)(b)(I) and (1)(b)(II) amended and (1)(b)(III) and (1)(b)(IV) repealed, (SB 22-013), ch. 2 p. 35, § 45, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by House Bill 75-1232 and Senate Bill 75-453 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

23-40-104.5. Tuition - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1843, § 10, effective June 9.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2010, p. 1843.)

23-40-105. Granting of degrees and diplomas.

The university of northern Colorado is authorized to grant degrees and diplomas to the students who have completed the full course of instruction in said university and who have been recommended for such diplomas by the faculty of said university. Any such diploma, when signed by the president of said university, the commissioner of education, and the president and secretary of the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado, shall be evidence that the receiver thereof is a graduate of said university and is entitled to all the honors and privileges of a graduate.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 212, § 32, effective July 16.

23-40-106. Education innovation institute established - purposes - appropriations - report.

There is hereby established within the university of northern Colorado the education innovation institute, referred to in this section as the "institute". The university shall administer the institute.

The purposes of the institute shall include, but not be limited to:

Collaborating with institutions to leverage research, funding, expertise, and other resources;

Discovering and studying innovations in teaching and learning;

Creating, piloting, and advocating for innovations in educational delivery methods;

Producing data and analyses concerning issues including, but not limited to, the following:

Existing or nascent problems in education;

Models of innovative educational solutions; and

Financing and governance models for educational settings;

Providing public policy makers with data and analyses concerning:

Educational program effectiveness; and

Innovative options for public and private educational settings;

Identifying innovative uses of existing school facilities in the state for the purpose of collaboration between elementary, secondary, and higher education institutions; and

Identifying key issues and setting research priorities in consultation with education experts, business and community leaders, and public officials.

The general assembly may appropriate moneys to the board of trustees of the university of northern Colorado for the administration of the institute.

The board of trustees of the university may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations from public and private sources to fund the institute.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before January 10, 2011, and on or before January 10 each year thereafter, the institute shall prepare and submit a report to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, concerning the activities of the institute in the previous calendar year. The report shall include, at a minimum, information concerning the efforts of the institute to fulfill its purposes as described in subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-032), ch. 13, p. 81, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (HB 17-1251), ch. 253, p. 1061, § 14, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 13, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.